Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1816
Public entity collecting mandated project charges; billing explanation required.

A public entity collecting mandated project charges shall annually provide its customers with a concise explanation of mandated project charges billed to customers. Such explanation may be by billing insert, web site information, or other appropriate means.

Laws 2006, LB 548, § 16.